Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2638.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Laws 2023, chapter 64, article 5, section 25, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Exemption; refund. (a) Materials and supplies used or consumed in and equipment incorporated into the construction, reconstruction, upgrade, expansion, renovation, or remodeling of a new water treatment plant new text begin and trunk water main improvements new text end in the city of Ramsey are exempt from sales and use tax under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 297A, provided that the materials, supplies, and equipment are purchased after December 31, 2022, and before July 1, 2027. (b) The tax must be imposed and collected as if the rate under Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.62, deleted text begin subdivisiondeleted text end new text begin subdivisionsnew text end 1new text begin and 1anew text end , applied and then refunded in the same manner provided for projects under Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.75, subdivision 1, clause (17). Refunds for eligible purchases must not be issued until after June 30, 2023deleted text begin , and before July 1, 2027deleted text end . new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective retroactively for sales and purchases made after December 31, 2022, and before July 1, 2027. new text end